en: sweet and sour sauce
bg: сладко-кисел сос
de: Susssäure Sauce
eo: dolĉacida saŭco
es: salsa agridulce
fi: hapanimeläkastike
fr: sauce aigre-douce
he: רוטב חמוץ-מתוק
hr: slatko-kiseli umak
id: Saus asam manis
is: Súrsæt sósa
it: salsa agrodolce
ja: 糖酢醤
ko: 탕추
nb: Sursøt saus
nl: zoetzure saus
pl: Sos słodko-kwaśny
pt: molho agridoce
sv: Sötsur sås
uk: Кисло-солодкий соус

en: teriyaki sauce
bg: сос терияки
de: Teriyaki-Soße
fr: sauce teriyaki
hr: teriyaki umak
it: salsa teriyaki
nl: teriyakisaus
pl: sos teriyaki

en: tomato sauce
ar: صلصة البندورة
bg: Доматен сос
bn: টমেটো সস্
ca: salsa de tomàquet
co: culatu
cs: rajská omáčka
da: tomatsauce
de: Tomatensauce
eo: tomatsaŭco
es: salsa de tomate
et: tomatikaste
eu: tomate saltsa
fa: سس گوجه فرنگی
fi: tomaattikastike
fr: sauce tomate, préparation à base de tomates, préparation aux tomates, preparation a base de tomates cerise
gl: Salsa de tomate
gv: soolagh traase
he: רוטב עגבניות
hi: टमाटर की चटनी
hr: umak od rajčice
hu: paradicsomszósz, paradicsom szósz
hy: Տոմատի սոուս
ia: sauce de tomate
id: Saus tomat
is: tómatsósa
it: salsa di pomodoro
ja: トマトソース
ka: პომიდვრის სოუსი
ko: 토마토 소스
lv: tomātu mērce
mk: до́матен сос
nb: tomatsaus
nl: tomatensaus
or: ଟମାଟ ଚଟଣୀ
pa: ਟਮਾਟਰ ਸੌਸ
pl: Sos pomidorowy
pt: molho de tomate
ru: томатный соус
sk: paradajková omáčka
sq: salcë domatesh
sv: tomatsås
tr: domates sosu
uk: Суґо
vi: Sốt cà
zh: 番茄沙司

en: pizza sauce
it: salsa per pizza
ja: ピザソース

en: worcestershire sauce, worcester sauce
af: worcestersous
ar: صلصة رسيستيرشاير
be: Вустэрскі соус
ca: salsa Worcestershire
cs: Worcestrová omáčka
da: Worcestershire sauce, engelsk sauce
de: Worcestershire Sauce, Worcestershiresauce
el: Σάλτσα Worcestershire
eo: Vorcestera saŭco
es: Salsa de Worcestershire
fa: سس ووسترشر
fi: Worcesterkastike
fr: sauce worcestershire, sauce worchestershire
he: רוטב ווסטרשייר
hr: worcester umak
hu: Worcester-szósz
id: Kecap inggris
it: Salsa Worcestershire
ja: ウスターソース
ko: 우스터셔 소스
ms: Sos Worcestershire
nb: Worcestersaus
nl: Worcestersaus, Worcestershiresaus
pl: Sos Worcestershire
pt: Molho inglês
ru: вустерский соус
sv: Worcestershiresås, engelsk sås
uk: Вустерський соус
zh: 辣醬油

en: bolognese sauce
xx: bolognese
ar: صلصة البولونيز
az: Bolonyeze sousu
bg: сос Болонезе
ca: Bolonyesa
cs: boloňská omáčka
de: Bolognese Sauce, Ragù alla bolognese
eo: bolonja saŭco
es: Boloñesa
eu: Boloniar saltsa
fi: bolognesekastike, bolognese-kastike
fr: sauce bolognaise
he: רוטב בולונז
hr: bolognese umak
it: Sugo alla bolognese, Ragù bolognese
ja: ミートソース
ko: 라구 볼로녜세
nl: bolognesesaus
pl: sos boloński, sos bolognese
pt: Molho à bolonhesa
ru: Болоньезе
sv: köttfärssås, bolognesesås
uk: Болоньєзе
zh: 蕃茄肉醬

en: vinaigrette
be: вінегрэт
bg: Винегрет
bn: ভিনাইগ্রেট
br: gwinegrenn
ca: vinagreta
cs: vinaigrette
da: vinaigrette
de: Vinaigrette, Salatsauce
el: βινεγκρετ
eo: Vinagreto
es: vinagreta
et: vinaigrette
eu: Ozpin-olio
fa: وینگرت
fi: vinaigrette, vinegretti, viinietikkakastike
fr: vinaigrette, sauce vinaigrette
gl: vinagreta
he: וינגרט
hr: vinaigrette
hu: Vinyegret
id: rasa
it: vinaigrette
ja: ヴィネグレットソース
kk: Винегрет
ko: 비네그레트
lb: Vinaigrette
lt: Burokėlių mišrainė
ms: Vinaigrette
nb: vinaigrette
nl: vinaigrette
nn: vinaigrette
pa: ਵਿਨੈਗਰੇਟ
pl: winegret
pt: vinagrete
ru: винегретная заправка, соус винегрет
sq: vinagrete
sv: vinaigrette
uk: внегрет
vi: Dầu giấm
zh: 醋酱

en: lemon vinaigrette
bg: лимонов винегрет
de: Zitronenvinaigrette
fi: sitruuna-vinaigrette, sitruunavinegretti
fr: Vinaigrette au citron
hr: vinaigrette od limuna
it: vinaigrette al limone

en: burger sauce
fr: sauce hamburger, sauce burger
hr: umak za pljeskavice
it: salsa per hamburger
pl: sos hamburgerowy

en: Prepacked burger sauce, Prepackaged burger sauce
fr: Sauce burger préemballée
it: salsa per hamburger preconfezionata

en: prepared sauce
de: Fertigsoße, Fertigsauce, Soße fertig zubereitet, fertig zubereitete Soße
fi: Valmistettu kastike
fr: sauce cuisinée
hr: pripremljeni umak
it: salsa preparata

en: caramel sauce
bg: карамелен сос
de: Caramelsauce, Karamellsauce
es: salsa de caramelo
fi: karamellikastike
fr: sauce caramel
hr: karamel umak
it: salsa al caramello
ja: カラメルソース
nl: caramelsaus, karamelsaus
pl: sos karmelowy, sosu karmelowego
pt: molho de caramelo
ru: карамельный соус
sv: kolasås

en: salted butter caramel sauce
de: gesalzebe Karamellbuttersauce, gesalzene Butter-Karamell-Sauce
fr: sauce au caramel au beurre salé
hr: slani maslac karamel umak
it: salsa al caramello al burro salato

en: cream sauce
bn: ক্রিম সস্‌
cs: smetanová omáčka
da: flødesauce
de: rahmsauce
eo: kremsaŭco
es: salsa de crema
et: koorekaste, koorekastmes
fi: kermakastike
fr: sauce à la crème
hi: क्रीम सॉस
hr: umak od vrhnja
it: salsa di panna
ja: クリームソース
ko: 크림 소스
ml: ക്രീം സോസ്
nl: crèmesaus
or: କ୍ରୀମ ସସ୍
pa: ਕਰੀਮ ਸੌਸ
pl: sos śmietanowy
sq: salcë e bardhë
sv: gräddsås
zh: 奶油酱

en: hot sauce, chili sauce
ar: شطة
bg: лют сос, чили сос
ca: salsa picant
da: chilisauce
de: chilisauce
eo: kapsiketa saŭco
es: salsa picante
fi: chilikastike
fr: sauce chili
he: רוטב צ'ילי
hr: ljuti umak
id: saus pedas
it: salsa chili
ja: チリソース
ko: 핫소스
nb: chilisaus
nl: chilisaus
pl: sos chili, ostry sos
sv: chilisås, stark sås
tr: acı sos
vi: tương ớt
zh: 辣醬

en: sambal
xx: sambal
de: Sambal

en: sambal oelek
xx: sambal oelek
de: Sambal Oelek

en: Kanzuri
it: kanzuri
ja: かんずり

en: salsa
it: spagnolo salsa
pl: pikantny sos salsa

en: béarnaise sauce
be: беарнскі соус
bg: сос беарнез
ca: salsa bearnesa
cs: bearnéská omáčka
da: bearnaisesauce
de: sauce béarnaise
eo: bearnezo
es: salsa bearnesa
eu: saltsa bearnes
fa: سس برنیز
fi: béarnaisekastike
fr: sauce béarnaise
gl: salsa bearnesa
he: רוטב ביארנז
hr: béarnaise umak
it: salsa bernese
ja: ベアルネーズソース
kk: беарнэз
ko: 베아르네즈 소스
nb: béarnaisesaus
nl: bearnaisesaus
nn: bearnés
pl: sos bearneński, sos berneński
ro: sos bearnez
ru: беарнский соус
se: béarnaisebuonjus
sv: bearnaisesås
tr: béarnaise sosu